Washington statutes.
RCW 2.24.060

Referees—Definition—Powers.

A referee is a person appointed by the court or judicial officer with power—

(1) To try an issue of law or of fact in a civil action or proceeding and report thereon.

(2) To ascertain any other fact in a civil action or proceeding when necessary for the information of the court, and report the fact or to take and report the evidence in an action.

(3) To execute an order, judgment or decree or to exercise any other power or perform any other duty expressly authorized by law.

[ 1891 c 25 s 1; RRS s 82.]

NOTES:

Referee asking or receiving unlawful compensation: RCW 9A.68.020, 9A.68.030.

Supplemental proceedings: Chapter 6.32 RCW.

Trial before referee: Chapter 4.48 RCW.